Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.280

Reporter as amanuensis in counties with populations of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more.

In all counties or judicial districts, except in any county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more, such official reporter shall act as amanuensis to the court for which he or she is appointed.

[ 1991 c 363 s 3; 1957 c 244 s 5; 1943 c 69 s 5; 1913 c 126 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 42-9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.